Tennessee, session 114, HB0862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall study the economic impact that the cosmetology and barbering professions have in
this state, including revenue generated through the services provided and the number of
jobs generated by the professions.
(b) TACIR may request information and input from the department of commerce
and insurance and other appropriate state and local governmental entities, as
necessary, and such entities shall comply with TACIR's request. The study must be
conducted from TACIR's existing resources.
(c) Upon completion of the study required by subsection (a), TACIR shall report
its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the
commerce and labor committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over cosmetology and barbering, and
provide a copy of the report to the legislative librarian. The report may be delivered
electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0862
002969
- 1 -